da: Aktiv ingrediens i klaringsmiddel: Aktivt kul; Bentonit; Kasein (mælkeprotein); Chitosan; Æggehvide; Gelatine; Husblas; Kieselsol; Blandet/kombination; PVPP; Pektinase (enzymbaseret); Sparkolloid; Gærskaller; Andet
fi: Kirkastusaineen vaikuttava aine: Aktiivihiili; Bentoniitti; Kaseiini (maitoproteiini); Kitosaani; Munan albumiini; Gelatiini; Kalaliima; Kieselsol (piidioksidisoli); Sekoite/yhdistelmä; PVPP; Pektinaasi (entsyymipohjainen); Sparkolloid; Hiivankuoret; Muu
zh-TW: 澄清劑活性成分: 活性碳; 膨潤土; 酪蛋白 (牛奶蛋白); 殼聚醣; 蛋白; 明膠; 魚膠; 矽溶膠; 混合 / 組合; PVPP; 果膠酶 (酵素基底); Sparkolloid; 酵母殼; 其他
sk-SK: Účinná zložka číriaceho činidla: Aktívne uhlie; Bentonit; Kazeín (mliečny proteín); Chitosan; Vaječný albumín; Želatína; Vyzina; Kieselsol (silikagél); Zmiešané/kombinované; PVPP; Pektináza (na báze enzýmov); Sparkolloid; Kvasničné obaly; Iné
zh-CN: 抛光剂活性成分: 活性炭; 膨润土; 酪蛋白（牛奶蛋白）; 壳聚糖; 蛋清; 明胶; 鱼胶; 硅溶胶; 混合/组合; PVPP; 果胶酶（基于酶）; Sparkolloid; 酵母外壳; 其他
es: Ingrediente activo del agente clarificante: Carbón activado; Bentonita; Caseína (proteína de leche); Quitosano; Albúmina de huevo; Gelatina; Ictiocola; Kieselsol (sol de sílice); Mixto/combinación; PVPP; Pectinasa (a base de enzimas); Sparkolloid; Cortezas de levadura; Otro
sv: Aktiv ingrediens i klarningsmedel: Aktivt kol; Bentonit; Kasein (mjölkprotein); Kitosan; Äggalbumin; Gelatin; Husbloss; Kiselsol (kiseldioxid); Blandad/kombination; PVPP; Pektinas (enzymbaserad); Sparkolloid; Jästskal; Övrigt
tr: Patlatıcı maddesi aktif bileşeni: Aktif karbon; Bentonit; Kazein (süt proteini); Kitosan; Yumurta albümini; Jelatin; Isinglass (balık tutkalı); Kieselsol (silika sol); Karışık/kombinasyon; PVPP; Pektinaz (enzim bazlı); Sparkolloid; Maya kabukları; Diğer
ro-RO: Ingredient activ al agentului de finisare: Carbon activ; Bentonită; Cazeină (proteină din lapte); Chitosan; Albumen de ou; Gelatină; Clei de pește (isinglass); Kieselsol (sol de siliciu); Mixt/combinație; PVPP; Pectinază (pe bază de enzime); Sparkolloid; Coji de drojdie; Altele
hr-HR: Aktivni sastojak sredstva za bistrenje: Aktivni ugljen; Bentonit; Kazein (mliječni protein); Hitozan; Bjelanjak; Želatina; Riblja želatina; Kieselsol (silika-sol); Miješano/kombinacija; PVPP; Pektinaza (na bazi enzima); Sparkolloid; Ovojnice kvasca; Ostalo
en: Fining agent active ingredient: Activated carbon; Bentonite; Casein (milk protein); Chitosan; Egg albumen; Gelatin; Isinglass; Kieselsol (silica sol); Mixed/combination; PVPP; Pectinase (enzyme-based); Sparkolloid; Yeast hulls; Other
de: Wirkstoff des Schönungsmittels: Aktivkohle; Bentonit; Kasein (Milchprotein); Chitosan; Eiklar; Gelatine; Hausenblase; Kieselsol (Kieselsäuresol); Gemischt/Kombination; PVPP; Pektinase (enzymbasiert); Sparkolloid; Hefezellwände; Sonstige
lt-LT: Skaidrinimo priemonės aktyvus ingredientas: Aktyvintoji anglis; Bentonitas; Kazeinas (pieno baltymas); Chitozanas; Kiaušinio baltymas; Želatina; „Isinglass“ (žuvų klijai); Kiezelsolis (silicio zolis); Mišrus / kombinuotas; PVPP; Pektinazė (fermentų pagrindu); „Sparkolloid“; Mielių luobelės; Kita
vi: Thành phần hoạt chất của chất làm trong: Than hoạt tính; Bentonite; Casein (protein sữa); Chitosan; Lòng trắng trứng; Gelatin; Isinglass; Kieselsol (silica sol); Hỗn hợp/kết hợp; PVPP; Pectinase (gốc enzyme); Sparkolloid; Vỏ nấm men; Khác
ko: 정제제 활성 성분: 활성탄; 벤토나이트; 카제인(우유 단백질); 키토산; 난백; 젤라틴; 아이징글래스; 키젤졸(실리카 졸); 혼합/조합형; PVPP; 펙티나아제(효소 기반); 스파콜로이드; 효모 껍질; 기타
ja: 清澄剤有効成分: 活性炭; ベントナイト; カゼイン (乳タンパク質); キトサン; 卵アルブミン; ゼラチン; アイシングラス; キーゼルゾル (シリカゾル); 混合/ブレンド; PVPP; ペクチナーゼ (酵素ベース); スパーコロイド; 酵母外殻; その他
nl: Actief ingrediënt klaringsmiddel: Actieve kool; Bentoniet; Caseïne (melkeiwit); Chitosan; Ei-albumine; Gelatine; Vislijm; Kieselsol (silicasol); Gemengd/combinatie; PVPP; Pectinase (op basis van enzymen); Sparkolloid; Gisthulzen; Overige
pt-BR: Ingrediente ativo do agente clarificante: Carvão ativado; Bentonita; Caseína (proteína do leite); Quitosana; Albumina de ovo; Gelatina; Cola de peixe; Kieselsol (sol de sílica); Misto/combinação; PVPP; Pectinase (à base de enzimas); Sparkolloid; Cascas de levedura; Outros
fr: Ingrédient actif de l’agent de clarification: Charbon actif; Bentonite; Caséine (protéine de lait); Chitosane; Albumine d’œuf; Gélatine; Colle de poisson; Kieselsol (sol de silice); Mixte/combinaison; PVPP; Pectinase (à base d’enzymes); Sparkolloid; Écorces de levure; Autre
nb: Aktiv ingrediens i klaringsmiddel: Aktivt kull; Bentonitt; Kasein (melkeprotein); Kitosan; Eggehvite (albumin); Gelatin; Husblas (isinglass); Kieselsol (silikasol); Blandet / kombinasjon; PVPP; Pektinase (enzymbasert); Sparkolloid; Gjærceller; Annet
bg-BG: Активна съставка на избистрящия агент: Активен въглен; Бентонит; Казеин (млечен протеин); Хитозан; Яйчен албумин; Желатин; Рибен клей; Киселсол (силикатен сол); Смесен/комбиниран; PVPP; Пектиназа (на ензимна основа); Спарколоид; Дрождени обвивки; Други
hu: Derítőszer hatóanyaga: Aktív szén; Bentonit; Kazein (tejfehérje); Kitozán; Tojásfehérje; Zselatin; Halenyv; Kovaszol (Kieselsol); Kevert / kombinált; PVPP; Pektináz (enzimalapú); Sparkolloid; Élesztősejtfal; Egyéb
th: สารตกตะกอนที่ออกฤทธิ์: คาร์บอนกัมมันต์; เบนโทไนต์; เคซีน (โปรตีนนม); ไคโตซาน; อัลบูมินไข่; เจลาติน; ไอซิงกลาส; คีเซลซอล (ซิลิกาซอล); แบบผสม/รวม; PVPP; เพกทิเนส (เอนไซม์); สปาร์คคอลลอยด์; เปลือกยีสต์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: ingrediente ativo do agente clarificante: Carbono ativado; Bentonite; Caseína (proteína do leite); Quitosana; Albumina de ovo; Gelatina; Ictiocola; Kieselsol (sol de sílica); Misto/combinação; PVPP; Pectinase (à base de enzimas); Sparkolloid; Cascas de levedura; Outro
cs: Aktivní složka zjasňujícího činidla: Aktivní uhlí; Bentonit; Kasein (mléčná bílkovina); Chitosan; Vaječný bílek; Želatina; Vyzina; Kieselsol (křemičitý sol); Směs/kombinace; PVPP; Pektináza (na bázi enzymů); Sparkolloid; Buněčné stěny kvasinek; Jiné
sl-SI: Aktivna sestavina sredstva za bistrenje: Aktivno oglje; Bentonit; Kazein (mlečne beljakovine); Hitozan; Jajčni beljak; Želatina; Ribji mehur; Kiezelsol (silicijeva sol); Mešano/kombinacija; PVPP; Pektinaza (na osnovi encimov); Sparkoloid; Celične stene kvasovk; Drugo
it: Principio attivo dell'agente chiarificante: Carbone attivo; Bentonite; Caseina (proteine del latte); Chitosano; Albumina d’uovo; Gelatina; Colla di pesce; Kieselsol (sol di silice); Misto/combinazione; PVPP; Pectinasi (a base di enzimi); Sparkolloid; Scorze di lievito; Altro
el: Ενεργό συστατικό του μέσου διαύγασης: Ενεργός άνθρακας; Μπεντονίτης; Καζεΐνη (πρωτεΐνη γάλακτος); Χιτοζάνη; Αλβουμίνη αυγού; Ζελατίνη; Ιχθυόκολλα; Kieselsol (κολλοειδές πυρίτιο); Μεικτό/συνδυασμός; PVPP; Πηκτινάση (με βάση ένζυμα); Sparkolloid; Φλοιοί ζυμομυκήτων; Άλλο
ru: Активный ингредиент осветляющего агента: Активированный уголь; Бентонит; Казеин (молочный белок); Хитозан; Яичный альбумин; Желатин; Рыбий клей (изингласс); Кисельзоль (золь кремниевой кислоты); Смесь/комбинация; ПВПП; Пектиназа (на основе ферментов); Спарколоид; Оболочки дрожжей; Другое
pl: Składnik aktywny środka klarującego: Węgiel aktywny; Bentonit; Kazeina (białko mleka); Chitozan; Białko jaja; Żelatyna; Karuk; Zol krzemionkowy; Mieszanka/kombinacja; PVPP; Pektynaza (na bazie enzymów); Sparkolloid; Ściany komórkowe drożdży; Inny